Utah statutes.
45-2-8.   Liability in case of joint operation.

In any case where liability shall exist on account of any broadcast where two or more broadcasting or television stations were connected together simultaneously or by transcription, film, metal tape, or other approved or adapted use for joint operation, in the making of such broadcast, such liability shall be confined and limited solely to the person, firm, or corporation owning or operating the radio or television station which originated such broadcast.



Amended by Chapter 73, 1953 General Session

